California, session 20252026, AB1094.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 206.1 of the Penal Code is amended to read:206.1. (a) Torture is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of life.(b) (1) Except as described in paragraph (2), a defendant imprisoned for torture shall not be eligible for parole until they have served at least seven years, pursuant to Section 3046.(2) For a crime of torture committed on or after January 1, 2026, if the defendant is an adult who had care or custody of the victim and the victim was 14 years of age or younger at the time of the crime, the defendant shall not be eligible for parole until they have served at least 10 years.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.